Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1042
Nail technology temporary practitioner, defined.

Nail technology temporary practitioner means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to perform the practices of nail technology for a limited time under the supervision of a licensed nail technician or nail technology instructor.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.09;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 304.